Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB627.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 66AREPORTING OF DEATHSSec.66A01. Scope of chapter.66A02. Definitions.66A03. Required reporting.66A04. Penalties.66A05. Compliance reports.66A06. Regulations.66A07. Temporary regulations.66A08. Death certificates.12345678910111213141516171819 66A09. Deaths in Custody Review Panel.§ 66A01. Scope of chapter. This chapter relates to the mandated reporting of individuals in custody.§ 66A02. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bureau." The Federal Bureau of Justice Assistance."Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Death in Custody Reporting Act." 34 U.S.C. § 60105 (relating to state information regarding individuals who die in the custody of law enforcement)."Individual in custody." An individual who is detained or stopped by a police officer, engaged in an actual or perceived pursuit by law enforcement, under arrest, in the process of being arrested, en route to be incarcerated or incarcerated at a municipal or county jail, State prison, State-run boot camp prison, boot camp prison that is contracted out by the Commonwealth, a State or local contract facility or other State or local correctional facility. The term includes a juvenile facility."Medical facility." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3203 (relating to definitions)."Police officer." As defined in 53 Pa.C.S. § 2162 (relating to definitions)."Responsible individual or entity." The individual, private entity or public entity that is responsible for an individual in custody.20250SB0627PN0620 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 66A03. Required reporting. In accordance with the Death in Custody Reporting Act:(1) Each responsible individual or entity shall report a death of an individual:(i) while the individual is in the custody of the responsible individual or entity on a monthly basis to the commission; or(ii) while the individual is on a compassionate release, medical furlough, bail or any other release from custody, if the death occurs:(A) within three days of the release; and(B) in a medical facility.(2) The commission shall compile the reports under paragraph (1) and submit the information to the bureau.§ 66A04. Penalties. The failure to report the death of an individual in custody under this chapter shall be a misdemeanor, and an agency may be fined up to $1,000 for each day that the death was not reported.§ 66A05. Compliance reports. (a) Report.--Beginning December 1, 2026, and each December 1 thereafter, the commission shall submit a compliance report to the General Assembly, including all of the following information:(1) Compliance with the submission of reports of each death of an individual in custody from the responsible individual or entity to the commission.(2) Compliance with the submission of the reports of death of an individual in custody from the commission to the bureau.(b) Review.--The Office of Attorney General shall review the 20250SB0627PN0620 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following for each report submitted under subsection (a):(1) The accuracy of the information provided in the report.(2) Whether the report was submitted in accordance with the requirements under subsection (a).§ 66A06. Regulations.The commission may promulgate rules and regulations to administer and enforce this chapter.§ 66A07. Temporary regulations. (a) Authority.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this chapter, the commission may promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The commission may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--The commission's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (a) shall expire two years after the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(c) Notice.--The commission shall transmit notice of 20250SB0627PN0620 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 temporary regulations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.§ 66A08. Death certificates.Notwithstanding the provisions of Article V of the act of June 29, 1953 (P.L.304, No.66), known as the Vital Statistics Law of 1953, a certificate of death or fetal death shall include a section for notation or check-off to indicate if a person or fetus died in custody.§ 66A09. Deaths in Custody Review Panel. (a) Establishment.--The Deaths in Custody Review Panel is established within the commission.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of the panel is to review deaths of individuals in custody and propose recommendations for the prevention of future deaths of individuals in custody.(c) Members.--The panel shall consist of the following members:(1) The Secretary of Health, or a designee.(2) A justice of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court selected by the Chief Justice of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court, or a designee.(3) A doctor of internal medicine appointed by the Governor.(4) Two members appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate as follows:(i) One psychiatrist licensed to practice in this Commonwealth who is not employed by a governmental entity.(ii) One social worker or social service provider who previously was or is currently employed by a State 20250SB0627PN0620 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 correctional institution.(5) Two members appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate as follows:(i) One individual representative of corrections officers.(ii) One forensic pathologist who is certified by the American Board of Pathology and has been practicing in good standing for at least five years.(6) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives as follows:(i) One attorney admitted to practice law in this Commonwealth who specializes in prisoners' rights.(ii) One representative from the Pennsylvania Prison Society.(7) Two members appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives as follows:(i) One emergency medical services provider who is not employed by a governmental entity.(ii) One health statistician who is not employed by a governmental entity.(d) Member terms.--Member terms shall be as follows:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a member shall be appointed for a term of four years and shall serve until a successor is appointed.(2) The following shall apply to the members initially appointed to the panel:(i) A member initially appointed under subsection (c)(1), (2) or (3) shall serve for a term of one year and shall serve until a successor is appointed.(ii) A member initially appointed under subsection 20250SB0627PN0620 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c)(4) or (5) shall serve for a term of two years and shall serve until a successor is appointed.(iii) A member initially appointed under subsection (c) (6) or (7) shall serve a term of three years and shall serve until a successor is appointed.(e) Meetings.--The panel shall meet when necessary, at least once every six months, to fulfill the duties and goals of the panel. The initial meeting of the panel shall be held within 60 days of the effective date of this section.(f) Duties.--(1) The panel shall review death cases identified by the commission from sources, including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Checkboxes on a decedent's death certificate.(ii) Vital statistics linkage of individual's custodial status with death records.(iii) Direct referrals from health care facilities and health care providers.(iv) Medical examiners and coroners.(2) In conducting a review of a death case of an individual in custody, the panel may review the following:(i) Medical examiner and coroner's reports or postmortem examination records.(ii) Death certificates and birth certificates.(iii) Law enforcement records and interviews with law enforcement officials , provided that the release of the records will not jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation or proceeding.(iv) Medical records from hospitals and other health care providers.20250SB0627PN0620 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Information made available by firefighters or emergency services personnel.(vi) Reports and records made available by the court to the extent permitted by law or court rule.(vii) Reports to animal control.(viii) Emergency medical services records.(ix) Department of Human Services records.(x) Any other records necessary to conduct the review.(3) Data under paragraph (2) is not limited to summaries, annual reports, abstracts or other abbreviated documents. There shall be a presumption that data requested by the panel shall be relevant and shall be provided to the panel. Data may not be withheld from the panel absent a showing of good cause.(4) The panel shall summarize causes of death and findings and report recommendations regarding the prevention of deaths of individuals in custody.(5) The panel shall submit a report consisting of aggregated, nonindividually identifiable findings and recommendations at least every year to the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Trends in deaths of individuals in custody as identified by the panel.(ii) Policy recommendations.(g) Authority to access data.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and 20250SB0627PN0620 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936), health care facilities and health care providers shall provide medical records of the deceased under review without the authorization of a person in interest to the panel for purposes of review under this section.(2) Other records pertaining to the deceased under review for the purposes of this section shall be open to inspection as permitted by law.(3) Licensed health care providers, health care facilities and pharmacies shall provide reasonable access to the panel for the purpose of reviewing medical records associated with death cases under review by the panel.(h) Confidentiality and protection of collected data, proceedings and activities.--(1) The panel shall maintain the confidentiality of any identifying information obtained relating to the death of an individual in custody, including the names of the deceased, guardians, family members, caretakers and alleged or suspected perpetrators of abuse, neglect or a criminal act.(2) Each member of the panel and any person appearing before the panel shall sign a confidentiality agreement applicable to all proceedings and reviews conducted by the panel.(3) An individual or agency that in good faith provides information or records to the commission shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability as a result of providing the information or record.(4) The proceedings, deliberations and records of the panel are privileged and confidential and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena or introduction into evidence 20250SB0627PN0620 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in a civil or criminal action.(5) Meetings of the panel at which a specific death is discussed shall be closed to the public and shall not be subject to the provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(6) Nothing in this section shall prevent the panel from allowing the attendance of a person, including a parent, with information relevant to a review at a panel meeting.(7) A person who violates the provisions of this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(8) Information collected under this section shall be summarized and reported in an aggregated, nonindividually identifiable manner.(9) Information collected under this act shall be exempt from the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(i) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Panel." The Deaths in Custody Review Panel established under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0627PN0620 - 10 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122